Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 35 School of Design

16-35-1.
Appropriations — Visitation.

Any sums that shall be from time to time appropriated by the general assembly to the Rhode Island School of Design shall be paid by the general treasurer upon the orders of the office of higher education, which is empowered and authorized to visit and examine the school at its pleasure.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 67, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 77, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 84, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 190, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-35-1

.

16-35-2.
Annual report of directors.

The directors of the school of design shall make an annual report to the office of higher education in manner and form prescribed by the office of higher education.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 67, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 77, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 84, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 190, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-35-2

.

16-35-3.
Commissioner as member of board of directors.

The commissioner of higher education shall, by virtue of his or her office, be a member of the board of directors of the school of design.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 67, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 77, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 84, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 190, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

16-35-3

.

16-35-4.
Appropriations and disbursements for textile department.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum as it may deem necessary, to be paid by the general treasurer to the Rhode Island School of Design upon the order of the state controller, upon the presentation of proper vouchers approved by the office of higher education, to be applied by the school exclusively to the general uses and purposes of its textile department.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 77, § 7; P.L. 1913, ch. 967, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 84, § 7; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 190, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65, impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-35-4

.